North Carolina, session 2025, HB236.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-32.1. 9/11 remembrance; Freedom Flag.
The Freedom Flag created by the Freedom Flag Foundation is designated as a symbol of the
State's continued remembrance of American lives lost as a result of the terrorist attacks in the
United States on September 11, 2001. The Freedom Flag may be flown with the flags of the
United States and of the State of North Carolina on public buildings and institutions and at county
courthouses across the State on September 11 of each year. Any named public office or public
official may accept a donation of one or more Freedom Flags to be displayed as provided in this
section."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H236-v-1*